Utah statutes.
19-1-508.   Exemptions.

This part does not apply to:

(1)  the sale of a motor vehicle or a part of a motor vehicle that contains engine coolant; or

(2)  a wholesale container of engine coolant that contains 55 gallons or more of engine coolant if it contains a conspicuous label indicating whether or not it contains a bittering agent.

